Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 4 Hearing

22-2-60.
Fixing of time for hearing by assessors; notification of parties.

If by reason of delay in appointing assessors or other cause the hearing cannot be conducted at the time fixed in the original notice, the assessors shall fix the time for the hearing and shall notify the parties in writing of the time and place of the hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 17; Civil Code 1895, § 4673; Civil Code 1910, § 5223; Code 1933, § 36-501.

22-2-61.
Power of assessors to subpoena and to compel attendance; right of parties to be represented.

The assessors shall have the same power to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses as is vested in the superior court.

Parties may be represented in person or by attorney before the assessors.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, §§ 18, 30; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4674, 4686; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5222, 5224; Code 1933, §§ 36-502, 36-503.

22-2-62.
Evidence to be heard by assessors generally.

The assessors shall hear all evidence offered by either party as to the value of the property or of any interest therein to be taken or used, the damages incurred by the owner of the property or of any interest therein, and the benefits to the owner accruing from the use of the property or interest by the condemnor.

Prospective and consequential damages resulting from the taking may be considered if such damages are plain and appreciable.

The increase of the value of the property or of any interest therein resulting from the proposed public improvement may be considered, but in no case shall such estimated increase deprive the owner of actual damages.

In the estimation of the value of the property or other interest taken for public uses, such valuation need not be restricted to the agricultural or productive qualities of the property or interest, but inquiry may be made as to all other legitimate purposes to which the property or interest could be appropriated.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 622, 623; Code 1868, §§ 686, 687; Code 1873, §§ 647, 648; Code 1882, §§ 647, 648; Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 18; Civil Code 1895, §§ 567, 568, 4674; Civil Code 1910, §§ 688, 689, 5224; Code 1933, §§ 36-503, 36-505, 36-506.

Law reviews.

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Thomas,

106 Ga. App. 849

,

128 S.E.2d 520

(1962), see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (1963).

22-2-63.
Manner of assessment.

The assessors, or a majority of them, shall assess the value of the property or interest taken or used, or the damage done, shall assess the consequential damages to the property or interests not taken, and shall deduct from such consequential damages the consequential benefits to be derived by the owner from the operation of the franchise by the condemnor or from the carrying on of the business of the condemnor, provided that the consequential benefits assessed shall in no case exceed the consequential damages assessed; provided, further, that nothing in this Code section shall be so construed as to deprive the owner of the actual value of his property or interest so taken or used.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 19; Civil Code 1895, § 4675; Civil Code 1910, § 5225; Code 1933, § 36-504.

Law reviews.

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Lumpkin,

222 Ga. 727

,

152 S.E.2d 557

(1966), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 483 (1967).

22-2-64.
Entry of findings by assessors.

The assessors shall enter their findings on the notice substantially as follows:

Upon the application of A.B. to condemn the following property or interest of C.D.:
_______________ , notice was duly served by the sheriff (or his deputy) on C.D. (owner, trustee, representative, or judge of the probate court, as the case may be) by (mailing, posting, etc., as the case may be). The applicant appointed E.F. as assessor. The (owner, judge of the probate court, representative, as the case may be) appointed G.H. as assessor, and they two (or judge of the superior court) appointed I.J. as assessor; E.F., G.H., and I.J., after being duly sworn and hearing the evidence, find and award that for taking the property or interest sought to be condemned, to wit:
_______________ , the said A.B. shall pay to C.D., as owner, the sum of $ _______________ . The consequential damages to the property or interest of C.D. not taken amount to $ _______________ , and the consequential benefits to $ _______________ ; and the said A.B. shall pay said C.D. the difference between such damage and such benefit.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 20; Civil Code 1895, § 4676; Civil Code 1910, § 5226; Code 1933, § 36-507.

22-2-65.
Filing and recording of award.

Within ten days after the award is made, it shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county where the property or interest is situated.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 21; Civil Code 1895, § 4677; Civil Code 1910, § 5227; Code 1933, § 36-508.